Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.500

School district collective bargaining agreements.

(1) All collective bargaining agreements entered into between a school district employer and school district employees under this chapter after June 10, 2010, as well as bargaining agreements existing on June 10, 2010, but renewed or extended after June 10, 2010, shall be consistent with RCW 28A.657.050.

(2) All collective bargaining agreements entered into between a school district employer and school district employees under this chapter shall be consistent with RCW 28A.400.280 and 28A.400.350.

(3) Employee bargaining shall be initiated after July 1, 2018, over the dollar amount to be contributed for school employee health benefits beginning January 1, 2020, on behalf of each employee for health care benefits. Bargaining must subsequently be conducted in even-numbered years between the governor or governor's designee and one coalition of all the exclusive bargaining representatives impacted by benefit purchasing with the school employees' benefits board established in RCW 41.05.740, consistent with RCW 28A.400.280 and 28A.400.350. The coalition bargaining must follow the model initially established for state employees in RCW 41.80.020.

(4) The governor shall submit a request for funds necessary to implement the collective bargaining agreement for the dollar amount to be expended for school employee health benefits, or for legislation necessary to implement the agreement. A request for funds shall not be submitted to the legislature by the governor unless such request:

(a) Has been submitted to the director of the office of financial management by October 1st prior to the legislative session at which the request is to be considered; and

(b) Has been certified by the director of the office of financial management as being feasible financially for the state.

The legislature shall approve or reject the submission of the request for funds. The legislature shall not consider a request for funds unless the request is transmitted to the legislature as part of the governor's budget document submitted under RCW 43.88.030 and 43.88.060.

If the legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, either party may reopen all or part of the agreement. However, if the director of the office of financial management does not certify a request under this section as being feasible financially for the state, the parties shall enter into collective bargaining solely for the purpose of reaching a mutually agreed upon modification of the agreement necessary to address the absence of those requested funds. The legislature may act upon the health care benefit provisions of the modified collective bargaining agreement if those provisions are agreed upon and submitted to the office of financial management and legislative budget committees before final legislative action on the biennial or supplemental operating budget. If the legislature rejects or fails to act on the submission, either party may reopen all or part of the agreement.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 817; 2010 c 235 s 802.]

NOTES:

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.